Missouri, session 2026, HB3508.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 192, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 192.2155, to read as follows:
192.2155. 1. The division of senior and disability services within the department
of health and senior services shall establish a dementia services coordinator as a full-
time position.
2. The dementia services coordinator shall:
(1) Evaluate the coordination of dementia services within this state;
(2) Coordinate information resources affecting Missourians living with dementia
and their caregivers. Such coordination shall include, but not be limited to:
(a) Using dementia-related data to coordinate ways to improve public health
outcomes and service delivery for persons with Alzheimer's disease or related dementia;
(b) Establishing and maintaining relationships with other agencies, providers,
and organizations within the state in order to meet the needs of affected populations and
prevent the duplication of services;
(c) Supporting the provision of dementia-specific staff training across all
relevant state agencies, including law enforcement, the department of health and senior
services, and other organizations; and
(d) Recommending strategies to improve coordination of dementia-related
services and resources provided by public and private entities;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3508 2
(3) Streamline all applicable state government services to increase efficiency and
improve the quality of care in residential, home-based, and community-based settings;
(4) Identify any duplicated services;
(5) Identify grant opportunities to expand the scope of services for persons living
with dementia and their caregivers and apply for the grant opportunities;
(6) Complete other duties relevant to supporting policy development and
implementation to enhance the quality of life for persons affected by dementia and their
caregivers;
(7) Promote public and professional awareness and education of dementia and
access to needed services and programs; and
(8) Collect and monitor data concerning the impact of dementia in Missouri.
✔